Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1514
County road unit system; abandonment; outstanding contracts.

Any county which adopts the county road unit system may at any general election after two years from the date of such adoption abandon the county road unit system and return to the county and township system; Provided, that every outstanding contract made by such county while operating under the provisions of the county road unit system be fully satisfied and complied with.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. II, § 14, p. 518.